Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.021

City officers enumerated—Compensation—Appointment and removal.

The government of a second-class city shall be vested in a mayor, a city council of seven members, a city attorney, a clerk, a treasurer, all elective; and a chief of police, municipal judge, city engineer, street superintendent, health officer and such other appointive officers as may be provided for by ordinance: PROVIDED, That the council may enact an ordinance providing for the appointment of the city clerk, city attorney, and treasurer by the mayor, which appointment shall be subject to confirmation by a majority vote of the city council. Such ordinance shall be enacted and become effective not later than thirty days prior to the first day allowed for filing declarations of candidacy for such offices when such offices are subject to an approaching city primary election. Elective incumbent city clerks, city attorneys, and city treasurers shall serve for the remainder of their unexpired term notwithstanding any appointment made pursuant to this section and RCW 35.23.051. If a free public library and reading room is established, five library trustees shall be appointed. The city council by ordinance shall prescribe the duties and fix the compensation of all officers and employees: PROVIDED, That the provisions of any such ordinance shall not be inconsistent with any statute: PROVIDED FURTHER, That where the city council finds that the appointment of a full time city engineer is unnecessary, it may in lieu of such appointment, by resolution provide for the performance of necessary engineering services on either a part time, temporary or periodic basis by a qualified engineering firm, pursuant to any reasonable contract.

The mayor shall appoint and at his or her pleasure may remove all appointive officers except as otherwise provided herein: PROVIDED, That municipal judges shall be removed only upon conviction of misconduct or malfeasance in office, or because of physical or mental disability rendering the judge incapable of performing the duties of his or her office. Every appointment or removal must be in writing signed by the mayor and filed with the city clerk.

[ 1994 c 81 s 35; 1993 c 47 s 1; 1987 c 3 s 9; 1969 c 116 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 116 s 9; 1965 c 7 s 35.24.020. Prior: 1961 c 81 s 1; 1955 c 365 s 2; 1955 c 55 s 5; prior: (i) 1915 c 184 s 2; 1891 c 156 s 4; 1890 p 179 s 105; RRS s 9115. (ii) 1929 c 182 s 1, part; 1927 c 159 s 1; 1915 c 184 s 3, part; 1893 c 57 s 1; 1891 c 156 s 1; 1890 p 179 s 106; RRS s 9116, part. (iii) 1915 c 184 s 28; 1890 p 196 s 137; RRS s 9142. Formerly RCW 35.24.020.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 3: See note following RCW 3.70.010.